New Jersey, session 221, A1520.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. A public institution of higher education shall not require a student, as a condition of admission or continued enrollment, to receive vaccination against COVID-19 or monkeypox if the student will have no in-person presence on the premises of the institution. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.